Utah statutes.
59-12-2218.   County, city, or town option sales and use tax for airports,
highways, and a system for public transit -- Base -- Rate -- Administration of
sales and use tax -- Voter approval exception.
(1) (a)  Subject to the other provisions of this part, the following may
impose a sales and use tax under this section:
(i)  if, on April 1, 2009, a county legislative body of a county of the second
class imposes a sales and use tax under this section, the county legislative
body of the county of the second class may impose the sales and use tax on the
transactions:
(A)  described in Subsection 59-12-103(1); and
(B)  within the county, including the cities and towns within the county; or
(ii)  if, on April 1, 2009, a county legislative body of a county of the
second class does not impose a sales and use tax under this section:
(A)  a city legislative body of a city within the county of the second class
may impose a sales and use tax under this section on the transactions
described in Subsection 59-12-103(1) within that city;
(B)  a town legislative body of a town within the county of the second class
may impose a sales and use tax under this section on the transactions
described in Subsection 59-12-103(1) within that town; and
(C)  the county legislative body of the county of the second class may impose
a sales and use tax on the transactions described in Subsection 59-12-103(1):
(I)  within the county, including the cities and towns within the county, if
on the date the county legislative body provides the notice described in
Section 59-12-2209 to the commission stating that the county will enact a
sales and use tax under this section, no city or town within that county:
(Aa)  imposes a sales and use tax under this section; or
(Bb)  has provided the notice described in Section 59-12-2209 to the
commission stating that the city or town will enact a sales and use tax under
this section; or
(II)  within the county, except for within a city or town within that county,
if, on the date the county legislative body provides the notice described in
Section 59-12-2209 to the commission stating that the county will enact a
sales and use tax under this section, that city or town:
(Aa)  imposes a sales and use tax under this section; or
(Bb)  has provided the notice described in Section 59-12-2209 to the
commission stating that the city or town will enact a sales and use tax under
this section.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (1)(a), a county, city, or town legislative
body that imposes a sales and use tax under this section may impose the tax at
a rate of:
(i)  .10%, to be:
(A)  as determined by the county, city, or town legislative body, deposited as
provided in Subsection (3)(b)(i) into the County of the Second Class State
Highway Projects Fund created by Section 72-2-121.2 and expended as provided
in Section 72-2-121.2;
(B)  as determined by the county, city, or town legislative body, expended for
a project or service relating to an airport facility for the portion of the
project or service that is performed within the county, city, or town within
which the tax is imposed:
(I)  for a county legislative body that imposes the sales and use tax, if that
airport facility is part of the regional transportation plan of the area
metropolitan planning organization if a metropolitan planning organization
exists for the area; or
(II)  for a city or town legislative body that imposes the sales and use tax,
if:
(Aa)  that city or town owns or operates the airport facility; and
(Bb)  an airline is headquartered in that city or town; or
(C)  as determined by the county, city, or town legislative body, deposited or
expended for a combination of Subsections (1)(b)(i)(A) and (B); or
(ii)  subject to Subsection (1)(c), .25%, to be expended as follows:
(A)  .10% to be deposited as provided in Subsection (3)(b)(i) into the County
of the Second Class State Highway Projects Fund created by Section 72-2-121.2
and expended as provided in Section 72-2-121.2;
(B)  .05%, to be deposited as provided in Subsection (3)(b)(ii) into the Local
Transportation Corridor Preservation Fund created by Section 72-2-117.5 and
expended and distributed in accordance with Section 72-2-117.5; and
(C)  as determined by the county, city, or town legislative body, .10% to be:
(I)  deposited as provided in Subsection (3)(b)(i) into the County of the
Second Class State Highway Projects Fund created by Section 72-2-121.2 and
expended as provided in Section 72-2-121.2;
(II)  expended for:
(Aa)  a state highway designated under Title 72, Chapter 4, Part 1, State
Highways;
(Bb)  a local highway that is a principal arterial highway, minor arterial
highway, major collector highway, or minor collector road; or
(Cc)  a combination of Subsections (1)(b)(ii)(C)(II)(Aa) and (Bb);
(III)  expended for a project or service relating to a system for public
transit for the portion of the project or service that is performed within the
county, city, or town within which the sales and use tax is imposed;
(IV)  expended for a project or service relating to an airport facility for
the portion of the project or service that is performed within the county,
city, or town within which the sales and use tax is imposed:
(Aa)  for a county legislative body that imposes the sales and use tax, if
that airport facility is part of the regional transportation plan of the area
metropolitan planning organization if a metropolitan planning organization
exists for the area; or
(Bb)  for a city or town legislative body that imposes the sales and use tax,
if:
(Ii)  that city or town owns or operates the airport facility; and
(IIii)  an airline is headquartered in that city or town; or
(V)  deposited or expended for a combination of Subsections (1)(b)(ii)(C)(I)
through (IV).
(c) (i)  Subject to the other provisions of this Subsection (1)(c), a city or
town within which a sales and use tax is imposed at the tax rate described in
Subsection (1)(b)(ii) may:
(A)  expend the revenues in accordance with Subsection (1)(b)(ii); or
(B)  expend the revenues in accordance with Subsections (1)(c)(ii) through
(iv) if:
(I)  that city or town owns or operates an airport facility; and
(II)  an airline is headquartered in that city or town.
(ii) (A) A city or town legislative body of a city or town within which a
sales and use tax is imposed at the tax rate described in Subsection
(1)(b)(ii) may expend the revenues collected from a tax rate of greater than
.10% but not to exceed the revenues collected from a tax rate of .25% for a
purpose described in Subsection (1)(c)(ii)(B) if:
(I)  that city or town owns or operates an airport facility; and
(II)  an airline is headquartered in that city or town.
(B)  A city or town described in Subsection (1)(c)(ii)(A) may expend the
revenues collected from a tax rate of greater than .10% but not to exceed the
revenues collected from a tax rate of .25% for:
(I)  a project or service relating to the airport facility; and
(II)  the portion of the project or service that is performed within the city
or town imposing the sales and use tax.
(iii)  If a city or town legislative body described in Subsection
(1)(c)(ii)(A) determines to expend the revenues collected from a tax rate of
greater than .10% but not to exceed the revenues collected from a tax rate of
.25% for a project or service relating to an airport facility as allowed by
Subsection (1)(c)(ii), any remaining revenues that are collected from the
sales and use tax imposed at the tax rate described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii)
that are not expended for the project or service relating to an airport
facility as allowed by Subsection (1)(c)(ii) shall be expended as follows:
(A)  75% of the remaining revenues shall be deposited as provided in
Subsection (3)(c) into the County of the Second Class State Highway Projects
Fund created by Section 72-2-121.2 and expended as provided in Section
72-2-121.2; and
(B)  25% of the remaining revenues shall be deposited as provided in
Subsection (3)(c) into the Local Transportation Corridor Preservation Fund
created by Section 72-2-117.5 and expended and distributed in accordance with
Section 72-2-117.5.
(iv)  A city or town legislative body that expends the revenues collected from
a sales and use tax imposed at the tax rate described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii)
in accordance with Subsections (1)(c)(ii) and (iii):
(A)  shall, on or before the date the city or town legislative body provides
the notice described in Section 59-12-2209 to the commission stating that the
city or town will enact a sales and use tax under this section:
(I)  determine the tax rate:
(Aa)  the collections from which the city or town legislative body will expend
for a project or service relating to an airport facility as allowed by
Subsection (1)(c)(ii); and
(Bb)  at a percentage that is greater than .10% but does not exceed .25%; and
(II)  notify the commission in writing of the tax rate the city or town
legislative body determines in accordance with Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(A)(I);
(B)  shall, on or before the April 1 immediately following the date the city
or town legislative body provides the notice described in Subsection
(1)(c)(iv)(A) to the commission:
(I)  determine the tax rate:
(Aa)  the collections from which the city or town legislative body will expend
for a project or service relating to an airport facility as allowed by
Subsection (1)(c)(ii); and
(Bb)  at a percentage that is greater than .10% but does not exceed .25%; and
(II)  notify the commission in writing of the tax rate the city or town
legislative body determines in accordance with Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B)(I);
(C)  shall, on or before April 1 of each year after the April 1 described in
Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B):
(I)  determine the tax rate:
(Aa)  the collections from which the city or town legislative body will expend
for a project or service relating to an airport facility as allowed by
Subsection (1)(c)(ii); and
(Bb)  at a percentage that is greater than .10% but does not exceed .25%; and
(II)  notify the commission in writing of the tax rate the city or town
legislative body determines in accordance with Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(C)(I);
and
(D)  may not change the tax rate the city or town legislative body determines
in accordance with Subsections (1)(c)(iv)(A) through (C) more frequently than
as prescribed by Subsections (1)(c)(iv)(A) through (C).
(2)  Before a city or town legislative body may impose a sales and use tax
under this section, the city or town legislative body shall provide a copy of
the notice described in Section 59-12-2209 that the city or town legislative
body provides to the commission:
(a)  to the county legislative body within which the city or town is located;
and
(b)  at the same time as the city or town legislative body provides the notice
to the commission.
(3) (a)  Subject to Subsections (3)(b) through (e) and Section 59-12-2207, the
commission shall transmit revenues collected within a county, city, or town
from a tax under this part that will be expended for a purpose described in
Subsection (1)(b)(i)(B) or Subsections (1)(b)(ii)(C)(II) through (IV) to the
county, city, or town legislative body in accordance with Section 59-12-2206.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(c) and subject to Section
59-12-2207, the commission shall deposit revenues collected within a county,
city, or town from a sales and use tax under this section that:
(i)  are required to be expended for a purpose described in Subsection
(1)(b)(ii)(A) into the County of the Second Class State Highway Projects Fund
created by Section 72-2-121.2;
(ii)  are required to be expended for a purpose described in Subsection
(1)(b)(ii)(B) into the Local Transportation Corridor Preservation Fund created
by Section 72-2-117.5; or
(iii)  a county, city, or town legislative body determines to expend for a
purpose described in Subsection (1)(b)(i)(A) or (1)(b)(ii)(C)(I) into the
County of the Second Class State Highway Projects Fund created by Section
72-2-121.2 if the county, city, or town legislative body provides written
notice to the commission requesting the deposit.
(c)  Subject to Subsection (3)(d) or (e), if a city or town legislative body
provides notice to the commission in accordance with Subsection (1)(c)(iv),
the commission shall:
(i)  transmit the revenues collected from the tax rate stated on the notice to
the city or town legislative body monthly by electronic funds transfer; and
(ii)  deposit any remaining revenues described in Subsection (1)(c)(iii) in
accordance with Subsection (1)(c)(iii).
(d) (i)  If a city or town legislative body provides the notice described in
Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(A) to the commission, the commission shall transmit or
deposit the revenues collected from the sales and use tax:
(A)  in accordance with Subsection (3)(c);
(B)  beginning on the date the city or town legislative body enacts the sales
and use tax; and
(C)  ending on the earlier of:
(I)  the June 30 immediately following the date the city or town legislative
body provides the notice described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B) to the
commission; or
(II)  the date the city or town legislative body repeals the sales and use
tax.
(ii)  If a city or town legislative body provides the notice described in
Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B) or (C) to the commission, the commission shall
transmit or deposit the revenues collected from the sales and use tax:
(A)  in accordance with Subsection (3)(c);
(B)  beginning on the July 1 immediately following the date the city or town
legislative body provides the notice described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B) or
(C) to the commission; and
(C)  ending on the earlier of:
(I)  the June 30 of the year after the date the city or town legislative body
provides the notice described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B) or (C) to the
commission; or
(II)  the date the city or town legislative body repeals the sales and use
tax.
(e) (i)  If a city or town legislative body that is required to provide the
notice described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(A) does not provide the notice
described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(A) to the commission on or before the date
required by Subsection (1)(c)(iv) for providing the notice, the commission
shall transmit, transfer, or deposit the revenues collected from the sales and
use tax within the city or town in accordance with Subsections (3)(a) and (b).
(ii)  If a city or town legislative body that is required to provide the
notice described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B) or (C) does not provide the
notice described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B) or (C) to the commission on or
before the date required by Subsection (1)(c)(iv) for providing the notice,
the commission shall transmit or deposit the revenues collected from the sales
and use tax within the city or town in accordance with:
(A)  Subsection (3)(c); and
(B)  the most recent notice the commission received from the city or town
legislative body under Subsection (1)(c)(iv).
(4)  Notwithstanding Section 59-12-2208, a county, city, or town legislative
body is not required to submit an opinion question to the county's, city's, or
town's registered voters in accordance with Section 59-12-2208 to impose a
sales and use tax under this section if:
(a)  the county, city, or town imposes the sales and use tax under this
section on or after July 1, 2010, but on or before July 1, 2011; and
(b)  a purpose for which the county, city, or town will expend revenues
collected from the sales and use tax under this section is:
(i)  a project or service described in Subsection (1)(b)(i)(B); or
(ii)  a project or service described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii)(C)(IV).
